Nevada, session 83, SB63.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 603 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 21, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. Sections 2 to 21, inclusive, of this act may be cited as
the Nevada Youth Online Safety Act.
Sec. 3. As used in sections 2 to 21, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 4 to 11, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB63_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.1. “Affiliate” means a person that directly, or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, is controlled by, or
is under common control with, a specified person. As used in this
section, “control,” “controlling,” “controlled by,” and “under
common control with” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 78.418.
Sec. 4.3. “Cloud storage” means a service that enables a
person to have self-service and on-demand access to a network of
configurable computer resources, including, without limitation,
data storage services, analytics services and document sharing and
editing services that are hosted on or backed up to the Internet.
Sec. 4.5. “Covered digital platform”:
1. Means an online application, Internet website or other
online product, good or service that:
(a) Allows a person to:
(1) Become a registered user; and
(2) Establish an account, create a profile or otherwise
create, share and view user-generated content; and
(b) Serves as a medium for users to:
(1) Interact with other users through accounts, profiles or
other means; or
(2) Interact with or otherwise view the content generated by
other users of the platform.
2. Does not include an online application, Internet website or
other online product, good or service that:
(a) Is used or intended for the exclusive or nearly exclusive
purpose of:
(1) Sending or receiving electronic mail;
(2) Sending or receiving text messages;
(3) Facilitating teleconferencing or videoconferencing that
enables two or more persons who have provided their contact
information to each other to communicate in real time through the
transmission and reception of audio and video signals;
(4) Facilitating cloud storage or cloud computing services,
including, without limitation, a service that allows users to
collaborate in real time to edit digital documents and photographs;
(5) Providing to pupils enrolled in a public school in this
State educational or instructional materials that have been
approved by the Department of Education, the board of trustees of
a school district or the governing body of a charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable;
(6) Enabling users to obtain technical support for a product
or service;
-
*SB63_R1*

– 5 –
(7) Enabling users to search and apply for employment
opportunities and engage in other career development activities;
(8) Enabling users to shop and purchase goods and services
online or to otherwise facilitate electronic commerce activities;
(9) Distributing and facilitating the download of
applications and programs developed by third party developers
within a single application or service which enables users to
search for and download such applications and programs;
(10) Providing users with news, sports, entertainment or
other content that:
(I) Is specifically selected or curated by the platform for
inclusion on the platform and is not generated by users of the
platform; and
(II) Is not provided with any chat or comment feature or
other interactive functionality, unless such feature or functionality
is incidental to, directly relates to or is dependent upon the content
provided by the platform;
(11) Enabling an employer to facilitate communication
with and among employees of the employer using means that are
provided or hosted by the employer; or
(12) Facilitating telehealth or other forms of electronic
communication between a patient and a provider of health care
using means which are provided or hosted by the provider of
health care.
(b) Is operated or controlled by a nonprofit organization that is
recognized as exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(c) Facilitates interactive gaming, as defined in
NRS 463.016425.
(d) Provides a social gaming product or service and is operated
or controlled by a gaming licensee, an affiliate of a gaming
licensee or a third party that provides online services on behalf of
a gaming licensee or an affiliate of a gaming licensee.
Sec. 4.7. “Gaming licensee” has the meaning ascribed to
“licensee” in NRS 463.0171.
Sec. 5. “Minor” means a natural person who is less than 18
years of age.
Sec. 6. “Minor user” means a user of a covered digital
platform who is a minor.
Sec. 7. “Online contact information” means a unique user
identifier or username that can be used to facilitate direct contact
with a specific person online, including, without limitation:
1. An electronic mail address; or
-
*SB63_R1*

– 6 –
2. A user identifier or handle associated with a covered
digital platform, an instant messaging platform, a voice over
Internet protocol platform or a video chatting platform.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9.5. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 10. “Social gaming product” means an online or
mobile-based product or service that:
1. Enables users to play casino-style games that are free to
play;
2. Utilizes digital tokens, coins or other digital
representations of artificial value that:
(a) Do not have legal tender status recognized by the United
States;
(b) Have no cash value; and
(c) Can only be utilized or redeemed by the user within the
interface of the product or service;
3. Is operated by or promoted in conjunction with a gaming
licensee; and
4. Is specifically intended for and marketed to users who are
21 years of age or older.
Sec. 10.5. “Telehealth” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.515.
Sec. 11. “User” means a person who uses a covered digital
platform.
Sec. 12. The provisions of sections 2 to 21, inclusive, of this
act do not:
1. Require a covered digital platform to take any action with
regard to a user who does not reside in this State.
2. Apply to any covered digital platform which does not offer
services to users who are located within this State.
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. 1. Except as authorized by subsection 2, a covered
digital platform shall not use the personal information of a minor
user in an algorithmic recommendation system.
2. A covered digital platform may use the personal
information of a minor user in an algorithmic recommendation
system to prevent the covered digital platform from displaying or
recommending to a minor user content or advertising relating to
products or services, the purchase, possession or use of which by a
-
*SB63_R1*

– 7 –
minor is prohibited by law, including, without limitation, content
or advertising relating to alcohol, tobacco or cannabis products.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 shall not be construed to
prohibit contextual information delivery.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Algorithmic recommendation system” means a fully or
partially automated system that suggests, promotes or ranks
information for, or presents advertising to, a user.
(b) “Consumer device” means an electronic device that is used
primarily for personal, family or household purposes and which
connects to the Internet. The term may include, without limitation,
a computer, smartphone, electronic tablet, smartwatch, router,
Internet gateway, smart television or video game console.
(c) “Contextual information delivery” means the delivery of
information or advertising to a user based on inferences drawn
exclusively from the specific content of the specific page, forum or
other Internet website that a user is currently viewing at the time
during which the information or advertisement is being provided
on that page, forum or other Internet website. The term does not
include the recommendation of information or advertising in
whole or in part based on other pages, forums or other Internet
websites that have been viewed by a user.
(d) “Persistent identifier” means any data point that can be
used to recognize a specific user or a specific consumer device
belonging to a specific user over time and across different Internet
websites, applications and other online services. The term
includes, without limitation:
(1) An Internet cookie which contains a customer number;
(2) An Internet protocol address; or
(3) The serial number or unique identifier of a consumer
device.
(e) “Personal information” means information that is linked
or can reasonably be linked to a specific user, household or
consumer device, including, without limitation:
(1) A last name when accompanied by either a first name,
set of initials or a nickname;
(2) A date of birth;
(3) A physical address, including, without limitation, a
home, work or school address;
(4) Online contact information;
(5) A telephone number;
(6) A government-issued identification number, including,
without limitation, a social security number, passport number or
driver’s license number;
-
*SB63_R1*

– 8 –
(7) An image or voice contained within a photo, video or
audio file or in any other data;
(8) Information concerning a geographic location that is
sufficient to identify both the name of a street and the locality in
which the street is located; or
(9) A persistent identifier.
Sec. 19. 1. A covered digital platform shall accept and
comply with a request from the parent or guardian of a minor user
to disable any or all of the following features on the account of the
minor user and refrain from causing any content viewed by a
minor user to be delivered through or accompanied by any or all
of the following features:
(a) Infinite scrolling, including, without limitation:
(1) Content that continuously loads as the user scrolls down
the page without the need for the user to open a separate page and
which has no apparent end; or
(2) The use of pages with no visible or apparent end as the
user continues to scroll.
(b) The display of interactive metrics, icons or emoticons
which indicate:
(1) That another user has clicked a button to indicate their
reaction to a user’s content; or
(2) The number of times that other users have shared, liked
or reposted the user’s content.
(c) Video that begins to play without the user first clicking on
the video or on a play button for that video.
(d) Functions that allow a user or advertiser to broadcast live
video content in real-time to other users of the platform.
2. For the purposes of this section, a covered digital platform
shall be deemed to have disabled infinite scrolling if the covered
digital platform limits a minor user to viewing the lesser of:
(a) Six or fewer discrete items of content before the minor user
is required to open a separate page to view additional content or
click a button or pop-up warning to consciously indicate his or her
intent to view additional content; or
(b) Seven minutes worth of continuously loading content
before the page on which the content is shown ends or before the
minor user is required to open a separate page to view additional
content or click a button or pop-up warning to consciously
indicate his or her intent to view additional content.
3. As used in this section, “content” does not include any
content, material or other media that is generated by or within an
interactive video game which is necessary for or incidental to the
use and enjoyment of the interactive video game.
Sec. 20. 1. A covered digital platform shall:
-
*SB63_R1*

– 9 –
(a) Establish safeguards to limit the amount of time that minor
users spend using the covered digital platform each day and the
hours of the day during which the covered digital platform sends
notices to minor users that are reasonable for the digital platform
under the relevant circumstances; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, refrain from
sending notifications to a minor user:
(1) Between the hours of 12 a.m. and 6 a.m., based on the
time zone in which the minor user is located; or
(2) Between the hours of 8 a.m. and 3 p.m., Monday
through Friday, during the months of August through May, based
on the time zone in which the minor user is located.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a covered
digital platform that receives a request from the parent or
guardian of a minor user shall not send notifications to the minor
user:
(a) Between the hours of 12 a.m. and 6 a.m., based on the time
zone in which the minor user is located; or
(b) Between the hours of 8 a.m. and 3 p.m., Monday through
Friday, during the months of August through May, based on the
time zone in which the minor user is located.
3. A covered digital platform subject to the provisions of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 may send a
notification to a minor user during a time period where the
delivery of a notification would otherwise be prohibited by those
provisions if the delivery of the notification is necessary:
(a) For the support of the internal operations of the covered
digital platform; or
(b) To effectuate settings or restrictions made by the parent or
legal guardian of the minor user through any parental control
features established by the platform.
4. As used in this section, “support of the internal operations
of the covered digital platform” has the definition ascribed to
“support for the internal operations of the Web site or online
service” in 16 C.F.R. § 312.2.
Sec. 21. A violation of the provisions of sections 2 to 21,
inclusive, of this act constitutes a deceptive trade practice for the
purposes of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
Sec. 22. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 23. Chapter 603A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 24 to 35, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 24. As used in sections 24 to 35, inclusive, of this act
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
-
*SB63_R1*

– 10 –
in sections 25 to 31, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 25. “Child” means a natural person who is less than 13
years of age.
Sec. 26. “Consumer device” means an electronic device that
is used primarily for personal, family or household purposes and
which connects to the Internet. The term may include, without
limitation, a computer, smartphone, electronic tablet, smartwatch,
router, Internet gateway, smart television or video game console.
Sec. 27. “Controller” means any person who:
1. Operates or provides any online service, product or feature
that is targeted to persons in this State; and
2. Alone or with other persons, determines the purpose and
means of processing personal data.
Sec. 28. “De-identified data” means data that cannot be
reasonably linked to an identified or identifiable person or a
particular consumer device that belongs or is linked to an
identifiable person.
Sec. 29. “Online service, product or feature”:
1. Means any service, product or feature that is provided
online.
2. Does not include:
(a) A telecommunications service, as that term is defined in 47
U.S.C. § 153;
(b) Broadband Internet access service, as that term is defined
in 47 C.F.R. § 54.400; or
(c) The delivery and use of a physical product.
Sec. 30. “Personal data”:
1. Means any information that is linked or reasonably
linkable to an identified or identifiable person.
2. Does not include de-identified data or publically available
information.
Sec. 31. “Process” means to perform any operation or set of
operations, whether performed by manual or automated means, on
personal data, including, without limitation, the collection, use,
storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion or modification of personal
data.
Sec. 32. The provisions of sections 24 to 35, inclusive, of this
act:
1. Do not apply to:
(a) A consumer reporting agency, as defined in 15 U.S.C. §
1681a(f);
(b) Any personally identifiable information regulated by the
Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 1681 et seq., and the
-
*SB63_R1*

– 11 –
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, which is collected,
maintained or sold as provided in that Act;
(c) A person who collects, maintains, or makes sales of
personally identifiable information for the purposes of preventing
fraud;
(d) Any personally identifiable information protected from
disclosure under the federal Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of
1994, 18 U.S.C. §§ 2721 et seq., which is collected, maintained or
sold as provided in that Act;
(e) Any consumer health data subject to the provisions of NRS
603A.400 to 603A.550, inclusive;
(f) A financial institution or an affiliate of a financial
institution that is subject to the provisions of the Gramm-Leach-
Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6801 et seq., or any personally identifiable
information regulated by that Act which is collected, maintained
or sold as provided in that Act; or
(g) A controller that, during a calendar year:
(1) Processes the personal data of less than 25,000
residents of this State; or
(2) Processes the personal data of less than 100,000
residents of this State and derives less than 50 percent of its gross
revenue from the sale of personal data.
2. Do not require a controller to take any action with regard
to a child who does not reside in this State.
Sec. 33. 1. Before processing personal data from a person
whom a controller knows to be a child, the controller shall obtain
verifiable consent from the parent or legal guardian of the child in
accordance with the Federal Children’s Online Privacy Protection
Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6501 et seq., and any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto.
2. A controller shall not process any personal data of a
person whom the controller knows to be a child:
(a) For the purposes of:
(1) Providing targeted advertising to the child;
(2) Selling the personal data of the child; or
(3) Profiling the child; or
(b) For any purpose that is not reasonably necessary and
limited in duration to enable the controller to provide the online
service, product or feature offered by the controller.
3. At the time that a controller collects personal data from a
person the controller knows to be a child with the intent of further
processing the personal data, the controller shall disclose the
purpose of the processing to the child. The controller shall not
further process the data except:
(a) For the purpose disclosed to the child; or
-
*SB63_R1*

– 12 –
(b) Where the additional processing is reasonably necessary
for carrying out and compatible with the purpose disclosed to the
child.
4. A controller shall not collect precise geolocation data from
a person whom the controller knows to be a child unless:
(a) The collection of precise geolocation data is reasonably
necessary and limited in duration to enable the controller to
provide the online service, product or feature in connection with
which the precise geolocation data is collected; and
(b) The controller displays to the child whose precise
geolocation data is being collected a notification, banner, symbol
or other indicator that:
(1) Informs the child that his or her precise geolocation
data is being collected; and
(2) Is displayed at all times during which the controller is
collecting the precise geolocation of the child.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Precise geolocation data” means information derived
from technology, including, without limitation, latitude and
longitude coordinates at the level of detail typically provided by a
global positioning system, that directly identifies the specific
location of a natural person with precision and accuracy within a
radius of 1,750 feet. The term does not include:
(1) The content of any communication; or
(2) Any data generated by or connected to advanced
metering infrastructure for utilities or other equipment used by a
utility.
(b) “Profiling” means a form of automated processing
performed on the personal data of a particular person that
evaluates, analyzes or predicts the personal aspects relating to the
person, including, without limitation, the economic status, health
status, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior,
location or movements of the person.
(c) “Targeted advertising”:
(1) Means the display of advertisements to a user of an
online service, product or feature that are selected or
recommended based on the personal data obtained from the online
activity of the user over time and across other online services,
products or features that are not affiliated with the online service,
product or feature or the controller thereof.
(2) Does not include:
(I) Advertisements based on the activity of a user within
online services, products or features operated by the same
controller;
-
*SB63_R1*

– 13 –
(II) Advertisements based on inferences drawn
exclusively from the specific content of the online service, product
or feature that the user is currently viewing at the time during
which the advertisement is being provided, including inferences
drawn from search queries performed by the user on the online
service, product or feature;
(III) Advertisements directed to the user in response to a
request for information or feedback submitted by the user; or
(IV) The processing of personal data performed solely
for measuring or reporting the performance, reach or frequency
of advertising.
Sec. 34. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
controller that offers any online service, product or feature that is
directed at children shall:
(a) Conduct, for each processing activity in which the
controller engages, a data protection assessment; and
(b) Retain each data protection assessment conducted
pursuant to paragraph (a) for at least 5 years after the controller
ceases to offer the online service, product or feature.
2. Each data protection assessment conducted pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 must:
(a) Contain a description of:
(1) The purpose of the online service, product or feature to
which the data protection assessment pertains;
(2) The categories of personal information processed by or
in connection with the online service, product or feature; and
(3) Each purpose for which the controller processes the
personal data of children.
(b) Identify the:
(1) Benefits to the controller, the users of the online
services, products or features offered by the controller, including,
without limitation, such users who are children, and the public
which may result, either directly or indirectly, from processing the
data of children; and
(2) The potential risks to the rights and safety of the
children whose data is processed by the controller, as mitigated by
the safeguards that the controller may reasonably implement to
reduce such risks, which may include, without limitation, using
de-identified data in place of personal data;
(c) Weigh the benefits identified pursuant to subparagraph (1)
of paragraph (b) against the risks identified pursuant to
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b), factoring in:
(1) The reasonable expectations of children who use the
online service, product or feature and the reasonable expectations
of the parents and legal guardians of such children; and
-
*SB63_R1*

– 14 –
(2) The relationship between the controller and the
children whose data the controller will process.
3. A controller shall be deemed to have satisfied the
requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 if the controller has
conducted:
(a) A single data protection assessment that addresses a
comparable set of data processing activities, each of which must
be similar, in which the controller engages.
(b) A data protection assessment in accordance with the laws
or regulations of another state or the Federal Government if the
assessment has a reasonably comparable scope and effect to an
assessment that the controller would otherwise be required to
conduct pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
4. The Attorney General may request any data protection
assessment conducted pursuant to this section if the Attorney
General believes that the content of such an assessment is relevant
to an ongoing investigation of a potential violation of section 33 of
this act. A controller shall provide to the Attorney General any
data protection assessment that is requested pursuant to this
subsection.
5. A data protection assessment provided to the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection 4 is confidential and is not a
public book or record within the meaning of NRS 239.010, and no
waiver of any applicable privilege in the information contained
within any such data protection assessment occurs as a result of
making any such information available or disclosing such
information to the Attorney General, the Office of the Attorney
General or any other officer or employee of the Office of the
Attorney General.
Sec. 35. 1. Upon determining that a controller has violated
or is violating any provision of sections 24 to 35, inclusive, of this
act, the Attorney General shall provide the controller with written
notice that identifies the specific provision of sections 24 to 35,
inclusive, of this act that the Attorney General determines that the
controller is violating or has violated and the specific facts
underlying that determination.
2. Not later than 30 days after receiving a notice pursuant to
subsection 1, a controller shall remedy the violation described in
the notice.
3. Failure by a controller to comply with the requirements of
subsection 2 constitutes a deceptive trade practice for the purposes
of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
Sec. 36. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
-
*SB63_R1*

– 15 –
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
-
*SB63_R1*

– 16 –
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 34 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
-
*SB63_R1*

– 17 –
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
-
*SB63_R1*

– 18 –
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 37. 1. A controller is not required to conduct a data
protection assessment pursuant to section 34 of this act for any
processing activity which the controller engaged in, created or
generated before October 1, 2025, but is required to conduct a data
protection assessment for any processing activity which the
controller engages in, creates or generates on or after October 1,
2025.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Controller” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 27 of
this act.
(b) “Process” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 31 of this
act.
Sec. 38. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 37, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB63_R1*